Illinois, session 104th, SB2085.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Sections 1-3.05, 1-3.45, and 6-16 and by adding 6Sections 1-3.47 and 6-35.5 as follows: 7    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.05)  (from Ch. 43, par. 95.05)8    Sec. 1-3.05. Alcoholic liquor. "Alcoholic liquor" includes 9alcohol, spirits, wine and beer, and every liquid or solid, 10patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer, 11and capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being. 12"Alcoholic liquor" also includes alcohol-infused products. 13"Alcoholic liquor" does not include frozen desserts containing 14alcoholic liquor. The provisions of this Act shall not apply 15to alcohol used in the manufacture of denatured alcohol 16produced in accordance with Acts of Congress and regulations 17promulgated thereunder, nor to any liquid or solid containing 18one-half of one per cent, or less, of alcohol by volume. No tax 19provided for in Article VIII of this Act shall apply to wine 20intended for use and used by any church or religious 21organization for sacramental purposes, provided that such wine 22shall be purchased from a licensed manufacturer or importing 23distributor under this Act.  SB2085- 2 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1(Source: P.A. 103-904, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.45)3    Sec. 1-3.45. Alcohol-infused products. "Alcohol-infused 4products" means any frozen or unfrozen, solid or semi-solid 5food in a form other than liquid, including, but not limited 6to, ice cream, ice pops, whipped cream, gelatin-based 7products, and other similar products, containing more than 80.5% alcohol by volume. "Alcohol-infused products" does not 9include frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor. 10(Source: P.A. 103-904, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.47 new)12    Sec. 1-3.47. Frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor. 13"Frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor" means ice creams 14or other frozen desserts that are made with liquor, wine, 15beer, cider, or any combination thereof and that contain more 16than 0.5% but not more than 5% of alcohol by volume. 17    (235 ILCS 5/6-16)  (from Ch. 43, par. 131)18    Sec. 6-16. Prohibited sales and possession. 19    (a) (i) No licensee nor any officer, associate, member, 20representative, agent, or employee of such licensee shall 21sell, give, or deliver alcoholic liquor or frozen desserts 22containing alcoholic liquor to any person under the age of 21 23years or to any intoxicated person, except as provided in   SB2085- 3 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1Section 6-16.1. (ii) No express company, common carrier, or 2contract carrier nor any representative, agent, or employee on 3behalf of an express company, common carrier, or contract 4carrier that carries or transports alcoholic liquor for 5delivery within this State shall knowingly give or knowingly 6deliver to a residential address any shipping container 7clearly labeled as containing alcoholic liquor and labeled as 8requiring signature of an adult of at least 21 years of age to 9any person in this State under the age of 21 years. An express 10company, common carrier, or contract carrier that carries or 11transports such alcoholic liquor for delivery within this 12State shall obtain a signature at the time of delivery 13acknowledging receipt of the alcoholic liquor by an adult who 14is at least 21 years of age. At no time while delivering 15alcoholic beverages within this State may any representative, 16agent, or employee of an express company, common carrier, or 17contract carrier that carries or transports alcoholic liquor 18for delivery within this State deliver the alcoholic liquor to 19a residential address without the acknowledgment of the 20consignee and without first obtaining a signature at the time 21of the delivery by an adult who is at least 21 years of age. A 22signature of a person on file with the express company, common 23carrier, or contract carrier does not constitute 24acknowledgement of the consignee. Any express company, common 25carrier, or contract carrier that transports alcoholic liquor 26for delivery within this State that violates this item (ii) of   SB2085- 4 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1this subsection (a) by delivering alcoholic liquor without the 2acknowledgement of the consignee and without first obtaining a 3signature at the time of the delivery by an adult who is at 4least 21 years of age is guilty of a business offense for which 5the express company, common carrier, or contract carrier that 6transports alcoholic liquor within this State shall be fined 7not more than $1,001 for a first offense, not more than $5,000 8for a second offense, and not more than $10,000 for a third or 9subsequent offense. An express company, common carrier, or 10contract carrier shall be held vicariously liable for the 11actions of its representatives, agents, or employees. For 12purposes of this Act, in addition to other methods authorized 13by law, an express company, common carrier, or contract 14carrier shall be considered served with process when a 15representative, agent, or employee alleged to have violated 16this Act is personally served. Each shipment of alcoholic 17liquor delivered in violation of this item (ii) of this 18subsection (a) constitutes a separate offense. (iii) No 19person, after purchasing or otherwise obtaining alcoholic 20liquor or frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor, shall 21sell, give, or deliver such alcoholic liquor or frozen 22desserts containing alcoholic liquor to another person under 23the age of 21 years, except in the performance of a religious 24ceremony or service. Except as otherwise provided in item 25(ii), any express company, common carrier, or contract carrier 26that transports alcoholic liquor within this State that   SB2085- 5 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1violates the provisions of item (i), (ii), or (iii) of this 2paragraph of this subsection (a) is guilty of a Class A 3misdemeanor and the sentence shall include, but shall not be 4limited to, a fine of not less than $500. Any person who 5violates the provisions of item (iii) of this paragraph of 6this subsection (a) is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and the 7sentence shall include, but shall not be limited to a fine of 8not less than $500 for a first offense and not less than $2,000 9for a second or subsequent offense. Any person who knowingly 10violates the provisions of item (iii) of this paragraph of 11this subsection (a) is guilty of a Class 4 felony if a death 12occurs as the result of the violation.13    If a licensee or officer, associate, member, 14representative, agent, or employee of the licensee, or a 15representative, agent, or employee of an express company, 16common carrier, or contract carrier that carries or transports 17alcoholic liquor for delivery within this State, is prosecuted 18under this paragraph of this subsection (a) for selling, 19giving, or delivering alcoholic liquor or frozen desserts 20containing alcoholic liquor to a person under the age of 21 21years, the person under 21 years of age who attempted to buy or 22receive the alcoholic liquor or frozen desserts containing 23alcoholic liquor may be prosecuted pursuant to Section 6-20 of 24this Act, unless the person under 21 years of age was acting 25under the authority of a law enforcement agency, the Illinois 26Liquor Control Commission, or a local liquor control   SB2085- 6 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1commissioner pursuant to a plan or action to investigate, 2patrol, or conduct any similar enforcement action.3    For the purpose of preventing the violation of this 4Section, any licensee, or his agent or employee, or a 5representative, agent, or employee of an express company, 6common carrier, or contract carrier that carries or transports 7alcoholic liquor for delivery within this State, shall refuse 8to sell, deliver, or serve alcoholic beverages or frozen 9desserts containing alcoholic liquor to any person who is 10unable to produce adequate written evidence of identity and of 11the fact that he or she is over the age of 21 years, if 12requested by the licensee, agent, employee, or representative.13    Adequate written evidence of age and identity of the 14person is a document issued by a federal, state, county, or 15municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, 16including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator's 17license, a registration certificate issued under the Federal 18Selective Service Act, or an identification card issued to a 19member of the Armed Forces. Proof that the defendant-licensee, 20or his employee or agent, or the representative, agent, or 21employee of the express company, common carrier, or contract 22carrier that carries or transports alcoholic liquor for 23delivery within this State demanded, was shown and reasonably 24relied upon such written evidence in any transaction forbidden 25by this Section is an affirmative defense in any criminal 26prosecution therefor or to any proceedings for the suspension   SB2085- 7 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1or revocation of any license based thereon. It shall not, 2however, be an affirmative defense if the agent or employee 3accepted the written evidence knowing it to be false or 4fraudulent. If a false or fraudulent Illinois driver's license 5or Illinois identification card is presented by a person less 6than 21 years of age to a licensee or the licensee's agent or 7employee for the purpose of ordering, purchasing, attempting 8to purchase, or otherwise obtaining or attempting to obtain 9the serving of any alcoholic beverage or frozen dessert 10containing alcoholic liquor, the law enforcement officer or 11agency investigating the incident shall, upon the conviction 12of the person who presented the fraudulent license or 13identification, make a report of the matter to the Secretary 14of State on a form provided by the Secretary of State.15    However, no agent or employee of the licensee or employee 16of an express company, common carrier, or contract carrier 17that carries or transports alcoholic liquor for delivery 18within this State shall be disciplined or discharged for 19selling or furnishing liquor or frozen desserts containing 20alcoholic liquor to a person under 21 years of age if the agent 21or employee demanded and was shown, before furnishing liquor 22or frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor to a person 23under 21 years of age, adequate written evidence of age and 24identity of the person issued by a federal, state, county or 25municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, 26including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator's   SB2085- 8 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1license, a registration certificate issued under the Federal 2Selective Service Act, or an identification card issued to a 3member of the Armed Forces. This paragraph, however, shall not 4apply if the agent or employee accepted the written evidence 5knowing it to be false or fraudulent.6    Any person who sells, gives, or furnishes to any person 7under the age of 21 years any false or fraudulent written, 8printed, or photostatic evidence of the age and identity of 9such person or who sells, gives or furnishes to any person 10under the age of 21 years evidence of age and identification of 11any other person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and the 12person's sentence shall include, but shall not be limited to, 13a fine of not less than $500.14    Any person under the age of 21 years who presents or offers 15to any licensee, his agent or employee, any written, printed 16or photostatic evidence of age and identity that is false, 17fraudulent, or not actually his or her own for the purpose of 18ordering, purchasing, attempting to purchase or otherwise 19procuring or attempting to procure, the serving of any 20alcoholic beverage or frozen dessert containing alcoholic 21liquor, who falsely states in writing that he or she is at 22least 21 years of age when receiving alcoholic liquor or a 23frozen dessert containing alcoholic liquor from a 24representative, agent, or employee of an express company, 25common carrier, or contract carrier, or who has in his or her 26possession any false or fraudulent written, printed, or   SB2085- 9 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1photostatic evidence of age and identity, is guilty of a Class 2A misdemeanor and the person's sentence shall include, but 3shall not be limited to, the following: a fine of not less than 4$500 and at least 25 hours of community service. If possible, 5any community service shall be performed for an alcohol abuse 6prevention program.7    Any person under the age of 21 years who has any alcoholic 8beverage or frozen dessert containing alcoholic liquor in his 9or her possession on any street or highway or in any public 10place or in any place open to the public is guilty of a Class A 11misdemeanor. This Section does not apply to possession by a 12person under the age of 21 years making a delivery of an 13alcoholic beverage or frozen dessert containing alcoholic 14liquor in pursuance of the order of his or her parent or in 15pursuance of his or her employment.16    (a-1) It is unlawful for any parent or guardian to 17knowingly permit his or her residence, any other private 18property under his or her control, or any vehicle, conveyance, 19or watercraft under his or her control to be used by an invitee 20of the parent's child or the guardian's ward, if the invitee is 21under the age of 21, in a manner that constitutes a violation 22of this Section. A parent or guardian is deemed to have 23knowingly permitted his or her residence, any other private 24property under his or her control, or any vehicle, conveyance, 25or watercraft under his or her control to be used in violation 26of this Section if he or she knowingly authorizes or permits   SB2085- 10 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1consumption of alcoholic liquor or frozen desserts containing 2alcoholic liquor by underage invitees. Any person who violates 3this subsection (a-1) is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 4the person's sentence shall include, but shall not be limited 5to, a fine of not less than $500. Where a violation of this 6subsection (a-1) directly or indirectly results in great 7bodily harm or death to any person, the person violating this 8subsection shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony. Nothing in this 9subsection (a-1) shall be construed to prohibit the giving of 10alcoholic liquor to a person under the age of 21 years in the 11performance of a religious ceremony or service in observation 12of a religious holiday.13    For the purposes of this subsection (a-1) where the 14residence or other property has an owner and a tenant or 15lessee, the trier of fact may infer that the residence or other 16property is occupied only by the tenant or lessee. 17    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section whoever 18violates this Section shall, in addition to other penalties 19provided for in this Act, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.20    (c) Any person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor 21where he or she knowingly authorizes or permits a residence 22which he or she occupies to be used by an invitee under 21 23years of age and:24        (1) the person occupying the residence knows that any 25    such person under the age of 21 is in possession of or is 26    consuming any alcoholic beverage or frozen dessert   SB2085- 11 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1    containing alcoholic liquor; and2        (2) the possession or consumption of the alcohol by 3    the person under 21 is not otherwise permitted by this 4    Act.5    For the purposes of this subsection (c) where the 6residence has an owner and a tenant or lessee, the trier of 7fact may infer that the residence is occupied only by the 8tenant or lessee. The sentence of any person who violates this 9subsection (c) shall include, but shall not be limited to, a 10fine of not less than $500. Where a violation of this 11subsection (c) directly or indirectly results in great bodily 12harm or death to any person, the person violating this 13subsection (c) shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony. Nothing in 14this subsection (c) shall be construed to prohibit the giving 15of alcoholic liquor to a person under the age of 21 years in 16the performance of a religious ceremony or service in 17observation of a religious holiday.18    A person shall not be in violation of this subsection (c) 19if (A) he or she requests assistance from the police 20department or other law enforcement agency to either (i) 21remove any person who refuses to abide by the person's 22performance of the duties imposed by this subsection (c) or 23(ii) terminate the activity because the person has been unable 24to prevent a person under the age of 21 years from consuming 25alcohol despite having taken all reasonable steps to do so and 26(B) this assistance is requested before any other person makes   SB2085- 12 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1a formal complaint to the police department or other law 2enforcement agency about the activity.3    (d) Any person who rents a hotel or motel room from the 4proprietor or agent thereof for the purpose of or with the 5knowledge that such room shall be used for the consumption of 6alcoholic liquor or frozen desserts containing alcoholic 7liquor by persons under the age of 21 years shall be guilty of 8a Class A misdemeanor.9    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, any person 10who has alcoholic liquor or a frozen dessert containing 11alcoholic liquor in his or her possession on public school 12district property on school days or at events on public school 13district property when children are present is guilty of a 14petty offense, unless the alcoholic liquor or frozen dessert 15containing alcoholic liquor (i) is in the original container 16with the seal unbroken and is in the possession of a person who 17is not otherwise legally prohibited from possessing the 18alcoholic liquor or frozen dessert containing alcoholic liquor 19or (ii) is in the possession of a person in or for the 20performance of a religious service or ceremony authorized by 21the school board.22(Source: P.A. 97-1049, eff. 1-1-13; 98-1017, eff. 1-1-15.) 23    (235 ILCS 5/6-35.5 new)24    Sec. 6-35.5. Frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor.25    (a) No person shall sell a package of frozen desserts   SB2085- 13 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1containing alcoholic liquor that contains more than 5% alcohol 2by volume. No person shall sell, give, or deliver frozen 3desserts containing alcoholic liquor to a person under the age 4of 21. A person under the age of 21 may not purchase, possess, 5or consume frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor.6    (b) No person shall sell a package of frozen desserts 7containing alcoholic liquor for consumption off the premises 8unless:9        (1) each package is a sealed package, as received from 10    the manufacturer or distributor;11        (2) each sealed package, as received from the 12    manufacturer or distributor, prominently bears the 13    following statements, in a format to be established or 14    approved by the State Commission:15            "(A) The sale of this product to individuals under 16        the age of 21 years is prohibited.17            (B) This product is made with (insert whichever is 18        applicable: liquor, wine, beer, cider, or a 19        combination thereof) and contains alcohol up to 5% by 20        volume.21            (C) NOTICE: This product contains alcohol used as 22        flavoring and, as with any product that contains 23        alcohol:24                (1) women should not consume alcohol during 25            pregnancy because of the risk of birth defects; 26            and  SB2085- 14 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1                (2) consumption of alcohol impairs your 2            ability to drive a car or operate machinery and 3            may cause health problems."; and4        (3) the following advisory, on a sign or poster not 5    less than 7 inches by 5 inches, in a format to be 6    established or approved by the State Commission, is 7    displayed prominently at each location where frozen 8    desserts containing alcoholic liquor are made available to 9    the public:10        "THIS AREA CONTAINS FROZEN DESSERTS CONTAINING 11    ALCOHOLIC LIQUOR. The sale of frozen desserts containing 12    alcoholic liquor to individuals under the age of 21 years 13    is prohibited.14        The frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor in 15    this area contain alcohol up to 5% by volume.16        NOTICE: Frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor 17    contain alcohol used as a flavoring and, as with any 18    product that contains alcohol:19            (1) women should not consume alcohol during 20        pregnancy because of the risk of birth defects; and21            (2) consumption of alcohol impairs your ability to 22        drive a car or operate machinery and may cause health 23        problems. IT IS A VIOLATION PUNISHABLE UNDER LAW FOR 24        ANY PERSON UNDER THE AGE OF 21 TO PRESENT ANY WRITTEN 25        EVIDENCE OF AGE WHICH IS FALSE, FRAUDULENT, OR NOT 26        ACTUALLY HIS OR HER OWN FOR THE PURPOSE OF ATTEMPTING   SB2085- 15 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1        TO PURCHASE FROZEN DESSERTS CONTAINING ALCOHOLIC 2        LIQUOR.".3    (c) No person shall sell at retail individual servings of 4frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor for consumption on 5the premises, unless the following statements are prominently 6displayed on the printed menu (or, if no printed menus are 7used, on the menu board or sign setting forth the bill of fare) 8immediately adjacent to the listing of the item or items of 9frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor:10        "(1) The sale of this product to individuals under the 11    age of 21 years is prohibited.12        (2) This product is made with (insert whichever is 13    applicable: liquor, wine, beer, cider, or a combination 14    thereof) and contains alcohol up to 5% by volume.15        (3) NOTICE: This product contains alcohol used as 16    flavoring and, as with any product that contains alcohol:17            (A) women should not consume alcohol during 18        pregnancy because of the risk of birth defects; and19            (B) consumption of alcohol impairs your ability to 20        drive a car or operate machinery and may cause health 21        problems.".22    (d) No manufacturer or distributor of frozen desserts 23containing alcoholic liquor shall sell such product to a 24person intending to sell at retail individual servings of 25frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor or packages of 26frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor for consumption   SB2085- 16 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1off the premises, unless, with each shipment, the manufacturer 2or distributor provides:3        (1) a written notice that individual servings of 4    frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor or packages of 5    frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor may be sold at 6    retail only if the retailer complies with all of the 7    requirements set forth in subsection (b); and8        (2) a written copy of the requirements set forth in 9    subsection (b). 10    (d) Frozen desserts containing alcoholic liquor are 11subject to all applicable food safety laws, rules, standards, 12and requirements, including, but not limited to, the 13provisions of the Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.  14    Section 10. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 15amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 16    (410 ILCS 620/10)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 510)17    Sec. 10. A food is adulterated - (a) (1) If it bears or 18contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may 19render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not 20an added substance such food shall not be considered 21adulterated under this clause if the quantity of such 22substance in such food does not ordinarily render it injurious 23to health; or (2) (A) if it bears or contains any added 24poisonous or added deleterious substance other than one which   SB2085- 17 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1is (i) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural 2commodity; (ii) a food additive; or (iii) a color additive 3which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection (a) of 4Section 13; or (iv) a new animal drug which is unsafe within 5the meaning of Section 14; or (B) if it is a raw agricultural 6commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which 7is unsafe within the meaning of Section 408 (a) of the Federal 8Act as amended; or (C) if it is or it bears or contains, any 9food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 10409 of the Federal Act as amended; provided that where a 11pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural 12commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or tolerance 13prescribed under Section 408 of the Federal Act and such raw 14agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing such 15as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating or milling, the 16residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such 17processed food shall, notwithstanding the provisions of 18Section 13 and Clause (C) of this Section not be deemed unsafe 19if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has 20been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing 21practice, and the concentration of such residue in the 22processed food when ready-to-eat, is not greater than the 23tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity; or 24(D) if it is, or it bears or contains, a new animal drug (or 25conversion product thereof) which is unsafe within the meaning 26of Section 512 of the Federal Act; or (3) if it consists in   SB2085- 18 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid 2or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for food; 3or (4) if it has been produced, prepared, packed or held under 4unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated 5with filth or whereby it may have been rendered diseased, 6unwholesome or injurious to health; or (5) if it is, in whole 7or in part, the product of a diseased animal or an animal which 8has died otherwise than by slaughter, or that has been fed upon 9the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse; or (6) if its 10container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or 11deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious 12to health; or (7) if it has been intentionally subjected to 13radiation unless the use of the radiation was in conformity 14with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to Section 1513 of this Act or Section 409 of the Federal Act.16    (b) (1) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in 17part omitted or abstracted therefrom; or (2) if any substance 18has been substituted wholly or in part therefor; or (3) if 19damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or (4) 20if any substance has been added thereto or mixed or packed 21therewith so as to increase its bulk or weight or reduce its 22quality or strength or make it appear better or of greater 23value than it is.24    (c) If it is confectionery, ice cream, or frozen dessert 25and it bears or contains any alcohol; however, this subsection 26shall not apply to any confectionery, ice cream, or frozen   SB2085- 19 -LRB104 05948 RPS 15981 b1dessert by reason of its containing less than 5% by volume of 2alcohol.3    (d) If it is or bears or contains any color additive which 4is unsafe within the meaning of Section 706(a) of the Federal 5Act.6    (e) If its packaging or labeling is in violation of an 7applicable regulation issued pursuant to Section 3, 4 or 5 of 8the Illinois Poison Prevention Packaging Act.9    (f) If it is an adulterated egg or egg product pursuant to 10Section 3.1 of the "Illinois Egg and Egg Products Act".11(Source: P.A. 85-179.)